Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2701.04
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 77-2701.04 to 77-2713 and 77-27,239, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 77-2701.05 to 77-2701.56 shall be used.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 4;

Laws 1992, Fourth Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 23;

Laws 1993, LB 345, § 15;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 28;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 77-2702.03;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 759, § 6;

Laws 2004, LB 1017, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 968, § 4;

Laws 2006, LB 1189, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB223, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB367, § 10;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB9, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB727, § 35;

Laws 2012, LB830, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB1080, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB96, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB867, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB419, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB57, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB26, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB595, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB984, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 60;

Laws 2024, LB937, § 68;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 82.